Hawaii, session 2026, GM1346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. (a) The department of education shall
establish a two-year student-authored book publication pilot
program in which students research, write, and publish original
works. The pilot program shall begin in the 2026-2027 school
year and be completed no later than the conclusion of the
2027-2028 school year. The pilot program shall be designed to
strengthen literacy, analytical thinking, and communication
skills; increase student engagement and confidence; support
students' academic progression and preparation for postsecondary
education; and foster connections to culture and community.
(b) The student-authored book publication pilot program
may be conducted at up to five Kalihi public elementary schools
and up to five Nanakuli-Waianae public elementary schools on an
opt-in basis and made available to students in grades four,
five, and six; provided that the pilot program shall be
integrated into the existing grade level curricula of
participating schools as a capstone.
2026-2473 SB2877 GDI SMA-3.docx
iiiiliinniiiiiHiiiiinigiiiiiii

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(c) Under the student-authored book publication pilot
program:
(1) Each teacher for grades four through six at
participating schools may select a topic for their
class relating to Hawaiian culture, the local
community, or a personal story; and
(2) Using a classroom student book publishing program,
each student shall write and illustrate a standard
size online book on the selected topic; provided that
the dimensions and length of the book shall be
determined by the teacher according to available
funds.
(d) Each teacher at participating schools shall receive a
budget to implement the student-authored book publication pilot
program in their classroom.
(e) The principal of each participating school shall
submit a report on the student-authored book publication pilot
program to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to
the convening of the regular session of 2029. The report shall
include:
2026-2473 SB2877 CDl SMA-3.docx

Page 3
S.B. NO.
^1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(1) Assessments of the pilot program's implementation,
student outcomes, and the feasibility of continuing or
expanding the pilot program; and
(2) Additional findings and recommendations.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $50,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
establishment of the student-authored book, publication pilot
program, to be distributed to participating schools based on the
number of students and cost of books.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
education for the purposes of this Act; provided that the sum
appropriated shall only be expended if private sources supply
matching funds of not less than twenty-five per cent of the
appropriated sum; provided further that any unencumbered funds
shall lapse to the credit of the general fund on June 30, 2028.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2473 SB2877 CDl SMA-3.docx 3
IlillMIMIIIIIIIMIi

2877
S.B. NO
w
I
o
b
o
b
APPROVED this 13th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2877, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
135-26

SB No. 2877, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives